Connecticut, session 2026, SB00492.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 1-217 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 (a) No public agency may disclose, under the Freedom of Information
4 Act, from its personnel, medical or similar files, the residential address
5 of any of the following persons: [employed by such public agency:]
6 (1) A federal court judge, federal court magistrate, judge of the
7 Superior Court, Appellate Court or Supreme Court of the state, or
8 family support magistrate;
9 (2) A sworn member of a municipal police department, a sworn
10 member of the Division of State Police within the Department of
11 Emergency Services and Public Protection or a sworn law enforcement
12 officer within the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection;
sSB492 / File No. 582 1

sSB492 File No. 582
13 (3) An employee of the Department of Correction;
14 (4) An attorney-at-law who represents or has represented the state in
15 a criminal prosecution;
16 (5) An attorney-at-law who is or has been employed by the Division
17 of Public Defender Services or a social worker who is employed by the
18 Division of Public Defender Services;
19 (6) An inspector employed by the Division of Criminal Justice;
20 (7) A firefighter;
21 (8) An employee of the Department of Children and Families;
22 (9) A member or employee of the Board of Pardons and Paroles;
23 (10) An employee of the judicial branch;
24 (11) An employee of the Department of Mental Health and Addiction
25 Services who provides direct care to patients;
26 (12) A member or employee of the Commission on Human Rights
27 and Opportunities; [or]
28 (13) A state marshal appointed by the State Marshal Commission
29 pursuant to section 6-38b;
30 (14) A state-wide elected officer or officer-elect;
31 (15) A member or member-elect of the General Assembly;
32 (16) A person appointed to any office of the legislative, judicial or
33 executive branch of state government by the Governor or an appointee
34 of the Governor, with or without the advice and consent of the General
35 Assembly;
36 (17) A judge of probate;
37 (18) A chief elected official or executive officer of a municipality;
sSB492 / File No. 582 2

sSB492 File No. 582
38 (19) A member of a representative town meeting, board of selectmen,
39 council, board of directors, board of aldermen or board of burgesses of
40 a municipality;
41 (20) A member of a local or regional board of education; or
42 (21) Any other employee of a public agency, except any person
43 described in subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of this section.
44 (b) The business address of any person described in this section, and
45 the address of each town hall, city hall or other municipal building in
46 which the office of the registrars of voters of a municipality is located,
47 shall be subject to disclosure under section 1-210. The provisions of this
48 section shall not apply to Department of Motor Vehicles records
49 described in section 14-10.
50 (c) (1) Except as provided in subsections (a), (b) and (e) of this section,
51 no public agency may disclose the residential address of any person
52 listed in subsection (a) of this section from any record described in
53 subdivision (2) of this subsection that is requested in accordance with
54 the provisions of said subdivision, regardless of whether such person is
55 an employee of the public agency, provided such person has (A)
56 submitted a written request for the nondisclosure of the person's
57 residential address to the public agency, and (B) furnished his or her
58 business address to the public agency.
59 (2) Any public agency that receives a request for a record subject to
60 disclosure under this chapter where such request (A) specifically names
61 a person who has requested that his or her address be kept confidential
62 under subdivision (1) of this subsection, shall make a copy of the record
63 requested to be disclosed and shall redact the copy to remove such
64 person's residential address prior to disclosing such record, (B) is for an
65 existing list that is derived from a readily accessible electronic database,
66 shall make a reasonable effort to redact the residential address of any
67 person who has requested that his or her address be kept confidential
68 under subdivision (1) of this subsection prior to the release of such list,
69 or (C) is for any list that the public agency voluntarily creates in
sSB492 / File No. 582 3

sSB492 File No. 582
70 response to a request for disclosure, shall make a reasonable effort to
71 redact the residential address of any person who has requested that his
72 or her address be kept confidential under subdivision (1) of this
73 subsection prior to the release of such list.
74 (3) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, an agency shall
75 not be prohibited from disclosing the residential address of any person
76 listed in subsection (a) of this section from any record other than the
77 records described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of subdivision
78 (2) of this subsection.
79 (d) (1) Except as provided in subsections (a), (b) and (e) of this section
80 and subject to the provisions of [subdivisions (2) and (3)] subdivision (2)
81 of this subsection, no public agency of a municipality may disclose,
82 under the Freedom of Information Act, from a public record, including
83 any record described in subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of this section,
84 the residential address of any person who is a municipal clerk, registrar
85 of voters, deputy registrar of voters, election official described in section
86 9-258, primary official described in section 9-436 or audit official
87 described in section 9-320f, regardless of whether such person is an
88 employee of the public agency, provided such person has (A) submitted
89 to the municipality a written request for the nondisclosure of the
90 person's residential address, and (B) furnished to the municipality (i) his
91 or her business address, or (ii) if such person does not have a business
92 address, the address of the town hall, city hall or other municipal
93 building in which the office of the registrars of voters of such
94 municipality is located.
95 (2) (A) If a person submits a written request described in subdivision
96 (1) of this subsection prior to the ninetieth day preceding an election, the
97 prohibition in said subdivision against disclosing such person's
98 residential address shall take effect on the ninetieth day preceding such
99 election and shall expire on the ninetieth day following such election.
100 (B) If a person submits a written request described in subdivision (1)
101 of this subsection on or after the ninetieth day preceding an election, the
102 prohibition in said subdivision against disclosing such person's
sSB492 / File No. 582 4

sSB492 File No. 582
103 residential address shall take effect upon such submission and shall
104 expire on the ninetieth day following such election.
105 [(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to
106 prohibit the disclosure of the residential address of any person
107 described in subdivision (1) of this subsection in the case where such
108 residential address appears on a public record by virtue of such person
109 holding any elective or appointive state or municipal office other than
110 municipal clerk, registrar of voters or deputy registrar of voters.]
111 (e) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prohibit
112 the disclosure without redaction of any document, as defined in section
113 7-35bb, any list prepared under title 9, or any list published under
114 section 12-55.
115 (f) No public agency or public official or employee of a public agency
116 shall be penalized for violating a provision of this section, unless such
117 violation is wilful and knowing. Any complaint of such a violation shall
118 be made to the Freedom of Information Commission. Upon receipt of
119 such a complaint, the commission shall serve upon the public agency,
120 official or employee, as the case may be, by certified or registered mail,
121 a copy of the complaint. The commission shall provide the public
122 agency, official or employee with an opportunity to be heard at a
123 hearing conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54,
124 unless the commission, upon motion of the public agency, official or
125 employee or upon motion of the commission, dismisses the complaint
126 without a hearing if it finds, after examining the complaint and
127 construing all allegations most favorably to the complainant, that the
128 public agency, official or employee has not wilfully and knowingly
129 violated a provision of this section. If the commission finds that the
130 public agency, official or employee wilfully and knowingly violated a
131 provision of this section, the commission may impose against such
132 public agency, official or employee a civil penalty of not less than twenty
133 dollars nor more than one thousand dollars. Nothing in this section shall
134 be construed to allow a private right of action against a public agency,
135 public official or employee of a public agency.
sSB492 / File No. 582 5

sSB492 File No. 582
136 Sec. 2. Section 9-601 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
137 amended by adding subdivision (39) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
138 (NEW) (39) "Personal security services" means services rendered to a
139 candidate by one or more individuals, other than on-duty law
140 enforcement personnel, for the personal security of such candidate, such
141 candidate's family or such candidate's campaign staff, which services
142 are necessary as a direct result of campaign activity that would not exist
143 but for such candidate's campaign.
144 Sec. 3. Subsection (e) of section 9-706 of the 2026 supplement to the
145 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
146 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
147 (e) (1) The State Elections Enforcement Commission shall (A) adopt
148 regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, on
149 permissible expenditures under subsection (g) of section 9-607, as
150 amended by this act, for qualified candidate committees receiving
151 grants from the fund under sections 9-700 to 9-716, inclusive, [and] (B)
152 on or after July 1, 2021, amend such regulations to permit expenditures
153 for child care services, and (C) on or after July 1, 2026, amend such
154 regulations to permit expenditures for personal security services, which
155 regulations so amended pursuant to this subparagraph shall allow
156 payment for the rendering of such services until the certification of the
157 results of the applicable primary or election.
158 (2) After the amendment of regulations pursuant to [subparagraph
159 (B)] subparagraphs (B) and (C) of subdivision (1) of this subsection,
160 expenditures for child care services and personal security services made
161 by the qualified candidate committee of a participating candidate shall
162 be deemed permissible if such expenditures (A) are, in the aggregate,
163 not more than the amount of qualifying contributions permitted under
164 section 9-704, and (B) comply with all regulations adopted or amended,
165 as applicable, pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
166 Sec. 4. Subsection (c) of section 9-710 of the general statutes is
167 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
sSB492 / File No. 582 6

sSB492 File No. 582
168 2026):
169 (c) A candidate who intends to participate in the Citizens' Election
170 Program may provide personal funds for such candidate's campaign for
171 nomination or election in an amount not exceeding: (1) For a candidate
172 for the office of Governor, twenty thousand dollars; (2) for a candidate
173 for the office of Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, State
174 Comptroller, State Treasurer or Secretary of the State, ten thousand
175 dollars; (3) for a candidate for the office of state senator, two thousand
176 dollars; or (4) for a candidate for the office of state representative, one
177 thousand dollars. Such personal funds shall not constitute a qualifying
178 contribution under section 9-704. For the purposes of this section, and
179 after the amendment of regulations pursuant to [subparagraph (B)]
180 subparagraphs (B) and (C) of subdivision (1) of subsection (e) of section
181 9-706, as amended by this act, expenditures for child care services or
182 personal security services made directly from any such candidate's
183 personal funds and for which such candidate does not seek
184 reimbursement from his or her candidate committee, as provided in
185 subsection (k) of section 9-607, shall not count toward the amounts
186 provided in subdivisions (1) to (4), inclusive, as applicable, of this
187 subsection.
188 Sec. 5. Subdivision (2) of subsection (g) of section 9-607 of the general
189 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
190 (Effective July 1, 2026):
191 (2) Unless otherwise provided by this chapter, any treasurer, in
192 accomplishing the lawful purposes of the committee, may pay the
193 expenses of: (A) Advertising in electronic and print media; (B) any other
194 form of printed advertising or communications including "thank you"
195 advertising after the election; (C) campaign items, including, but not
196 limited to, brochures, leaflets, flyers, invitations, stationery, envelopes,
197 reply cards, return envelopes, campaign business cards, direct mailings,
198 postcards, palm cards, "thank you" notes, sample ballots and other
199 similar items; (D) political banners and billboards; (E) political
200 paraphernalia, which is customarily given or sold to supporters
sSB492 / File No. 582 7

sSB492 File No. 582
201 including, but not limited to, campaign buttons, stickers, pins, pencils,
202 pens, matchbooks, balloons, pads, calendars, magnets, key chains, hats,
203 tee shirts, sweatshirts, frisbees, pot holders, jar openers and other
204 similar items; (F) purchasing office supplies for campaign or political
205 purposes, campaign photographs, raffle or other fund-raising permits
206 required by law, fund-raiser prizes, postage, express mail delivery
207 services, bulk mail permits, and computer supplies and services; (G)
208 banking service charges to maintain campaign and political accounts;
209 (H) subscriptions to newspapers and periodicals which enhance the
210 candidacy of the candidate or party; (I) lease or rental of office space for
211 campaign or political purposes and expenses in connection therewith
212 including, but not limited to, furniture, parking, storage space, utilities
213 and maintenance, provided a party committee or political committee
214 organized for ongoing political activities may purchase such office
215 space; (J) lease or rental of vehicles for campaign use only; (K) lease,
216 rental or use charges of any ordinary and necessary campaign office
217 equipment including, but not limited to, copy machines, telephones,
218 postage meters, facsimile machines, computer hardware, software and
219 printers, provided a party committee or political committee organized
220 for ongoing political activities may purchase office equipment, and
221 provided further that a candidate committee or a political committee,
222 other than a political committee formed for ongoing political activities
223 or an exploratory committee, may purchase computer equipment; (L)
224 compensation for campaign or committee staff, fringe benefits [,] and
225 payroll taxes, [and child care services, provided (i)] provided the
226 candidate and any member of his immediate family shall not receive
227 compensation; [, and (ii) compensation for child care services is
228 reasonable and customary for the services rendered;] (M) travel, meals
229 and lodging expenses of speakers, campaign or committee workers, the
230 candidate and the candidate's spouse for political and campaign
231 purposes; (N) fund raising; (O) reimbursements to candidates and
232 campaign or committee workers made in accordance with the
233 provisions of this section for campaign-related expenses for which a
234 receipt is received by the treasurer; (P) campaign or committee services
235 of attorneys, accountants, consultants or other professional persons for
sSB492 / File No. 582 8

sSB492 File No. 582
236 campaign activities, obtaining or contesting ballot status, nomination,
237 or election, and compliance with this chapter; (Q) purchasing campaign
238 finance reports; (R) repaying permissible campaign loans made to the
239 committee that are properly reported and refunding contributions
240 received from an impermissible source or in excess of the limitations set
241 forth in this chapter; (S) conducting polls concerning any political party,
242 issue, candidate or individual; (T) gifts to campaign or committee
243 workers or purchasing flowers or other commemorative items for
244 political purposes not to exceed one hundred dollars to any one
245 recipient in a calendar year or for the campaign, as the case may be; (U)
246 purchasing tickets or advertising from charities, inaugural committees,
247 or other civic organizations if for a political purpose, for any candidate,
248 a candidate's spouse, a member of a candidate's campaign staff, or
249 members of committees; (V) the inauguration of an elected candidate by
250 that candidate's candidate committee; (W) hiring of halls, rooms, music
251 and other entertainment for political meetings and events; (X)
252 reasonable compensation for public speakers hired by the committee;
253 (Y) transporting electors to the polls and other get-out-the-vote activities
254 on election day; [and] (Z) child care services and personal security
255 services, provided the amount paid for such services is reasonable and
256 customary for the services rendered; and (AA) any other necessary
257 campaign or political expense.
258 Sec. 6. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) There is established an account
259 to be known as the "legislative safety account", which shall be a separate,
260 nonlapsing account. The account shall contain any moneys required by
261 law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account shall be
262 expended by the Joint Committee on Legislative Management for the
263 purposes of safety, protection and security of state legislators and state
264 legislative staff.
265 Sec. 7. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Any moneys received by the Joint
266 Committee on Legislative Management from a national organization
267 representing the interests of legislatures in the states, territories and
268 commonwealths of the United States, during the fiscal year ending June
269 30, 2027, shall be deposited in the legislative safety account established
sSB492 / File No. 582 9

sSB492 File No. 582
270 pursuant to section 6 of this act.
271 (b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, there shall be
272 appropriated to the Joint Committee on Legislative Management from
273 the General Fund, for deposit in the legislative safety account
274 established pursuant to section 6 of this act, a sum equal in amount to
275 any moneys received by said joint committee as described in subsection
276 (a) of this section.
277 (c) For purposes of the appropriation or appropriations described in
278 subsection (b) of this section, whenever the Joint Committee on
279 Legislative Management receives any moneys from a national
280 organization described in subsection (a) of this section during the fiscal
281 year ending June 30, 2027, the executive director of said joint committee
282 shall certify to the Treasurer the amount of such moneys so received.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 1-217
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 9-601(39)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 9-706(e)
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 9-710(c)
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 9-607(g)(2)
Sec. 6 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 7 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(d)(1), "subdivisions (2) and (3)" was changed to
"[subdivisions (2) and (3)] subdivision (2)" for internal consistency; in
Section 5(2)(Z), "or" was changed to "and" for clarity; and in Section 7(c),
"said committee" was changed to "said joint committee" for consistency.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB492 / File No. 582 10

sSB492 File No. 582
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Resources of the General Fund GF - Potential See Below None
Cost
Legislative Mgmt. Legislative Safety See Below None
Account -
Potential
Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill creates a legislative security account, resulting in a potential
cost to the General Fund (GF) and a potential revenue gain to the
legislative safety account in FY 27.
The bill establishes the legislative safety account and requires, in FY
27 only, the GF to match any funding the account receives from national
organizations representing state legislatures, resulting in a potential cost
to the GF and a potential revenue gain to the legislative safety account.
The bill additionally makes changes regarding the disclosure of
residential addresses and allowable expenditures under the Citizens'
Election Program (CEP), which are not anticipated to result in a fiscal
impact to the state or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sSB492 / File No. 582 11

sSB492 File No. 582
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 492
AN ACT CONCERNING SECURITY OF PUBLIC OFFICIALS AND
EMPLOYEES.